Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3914.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Civil Liberties
Protection Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2201 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act, "unconstitutional federal actions" means
mass surveillance, data collection on pregnancies, religious
registries, or raids on houses of worship, schools or hospitals.
Req. No. 14218 Page 1

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2202 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The State of Oklahoma recognizes the supremacy of the U.S.
Constitution but also affirms its duty to protect the civil
liberties of its residents. The provisions of this act ensure state
resources are not used to facilitate unconstitutional federal
actions, while also respecting lawful federal authority.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2203 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No state agency or political subdivision of the state shall
expend any funds or take any actions that would be a direct
violation of a person's rights protected pursuant to any provision
of the United States Constitution or any provision of federal law
that affords protection against violation of such rights.
B. No state agency or political subdivision of the state shall
expend any funds or take any actions which would assist any other
entity, including but not limited to any entity authorized by
provisions of federal law, to take any action that would violate a
person's rights protected pursuant to any provision of the United
States Constitution or any provision of federal law that affords
protection against violation of such rights.

Req. No. 14218 Page 2

SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2204 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
No state agency shall collect, retain, or disclose pregnancy-
related data or religious affiliation information for the purpose of
federal enforcement. Any intergovernmental agreement that requires
such data sharing is declared null and void within Oklahoma.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2205 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Attorney General shall provide legal defense for
Oklahomans targeted by unconstitutional federal actions.
B. The Attorney General shall issue an annual public report
listing any requests for assistance pursuant to this act based on
proposed actions or actions taken by a federal agency, including the
number of requests for assistance that were denied.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2206 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created a cause of action if a state or
political subdivision unlawfully cooperates with prohibited federal
agencies or entities in violation of rights protected pursuant to
any provision of the United States Constitution or pursuant to any
federal law that affords protection against violation of such
Req. No. 14218 Page 3

righ ts. The action may be filed in the same manner as other civil
proceedings.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2207 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An employee of a state agency or employee of a political
subdivision shall be subject to discipline by the employing entity
for violations of the requirements of this act.
B. Any contractor, in performance of duties under a contract
with a state agency or with a political subdivision, shall be
subject to modification of contract terms based on violations of the
requirements of this act, or the contract may also be subject to
cancellation.
SECTION 9. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14218 MAH 01/10/26








Req. No. 14218 Page 4